Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB527.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Communication of Older Adult Abuse Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abuse." Either of the following:(1) as defined in section 103 of the act of November 6, 1987 (P.L.381, No.79), known as the Older Adults Protective Services Act; or123456789101112131415161718 (2) as defined in section 103 of the act of October 7, 2010 (P.L.484, No.70), known as the Adult Protective Services Act."Adult." As defined in section 103 of the Adult Protective Services Act."Facility." Any of the following:(1) A long-term care nursing facility as defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act.(2) A hospice as defined in section 802.1 of the Health Care Facilities Act.(3) A personal care home as defined in section 1001 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(4) An assisted living residence as defined in section 1001 of the Human Services Code."Older adult." As defined in section 103 of the Older Adults Protective Services Act.Section 3. Communication duties of departments.(a) Allegations involving older adults.--When an allegation of abuse involving an older adult residing in a facility is reported to the Department of Health or the Department of Human Services, the department that received the allegation shall:(1) Refer the allegation to the local area agency on aging for screening and investigation in accordance with the act of November 6, 1987 (P.L.381, No.79), known as the Older Adults Protective Services Act.(2) So long as the disclosure is not otherwise prohibited by law, provide all information related to the allegation to the local area agency on aging to aid in the 20250HB0527PN0520 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigation of alleged abuse.(b) Allegations involving adults.--When an allegation of abuse involving an adult residing in a facility is reported to either the Department of Health or the Department of Human Services, the department that received the allegation shall:(1) Refer the allegation in accordance with the act of October 7, 2010 (P.L.484, No.70), known as the Adult Protective Services Act.(2) So long as the disclosure is not otherwise prohibited by law, provide all information related to the allegation to the local contracted provider of protective services to aid in the investigation of alleged abuse.(c) Ongoing communication.--The Department of Health, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Aging shall establish ongoing communication to determine the most effective and efficient manner in which the information under this section will be shared.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede or negate the requirements for mandatory reporting under Chapter 5 of the Adult Protective Services Act or under Chapter 7 of the Older Adults Protective Services Act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0527PN0520 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223